Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 342.122 is amended to read:
342.122. (1) There  is created the National Board Certification Fund, separate and distinct from
the General Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the National Board Certification  Fund shall be
credited to the fund.
(2) The National Board Certification Fund shall include any state or federal  moneys made
available to the fund,  including moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly and federal
moneys made available to  improve teacher quality through professional development.  The
Teacher Standards and  Practices Commission may accept from any source any grant, donation or
Enrolled House Bill 2763 (HB 2763-B) Page 1
gift of money or other valuable thing made to the commission for purposes of the  [ National Board
Certification] fund.
(3) Moneys credited to the National Board  Certification Fund are continuously appropriated to
the commission for the purposes set forth in subsections (4) and (5) of this section. The  commission
may draw checks or orders upon the State Treasurer in making disbursements from the fund for the
purposes stated in this subsection.
(4) Moneys in  the National Board Certification Fund shall be used to encourage at least 150
public school teachers [ and administrators ] in this state to apply for and attain certification each
biennium through the National Board for Professional Teaching  Standards or any other national
professional organization for teaching standards  designated by the Teacher Standards and Practices
Commission.
(5) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission may disburse moneys  from the National
Board Certification Fund to applicants for assistance with the direct  costs of seeking and obtaining
national board  certification , including reimbursement for the costs of each of the components
necessary for  certification and reimbursement for costs related to participating in a cohort
for certification. The commission may retain no more than 10 percent of all moneys received
under this  section during a biennium from state and federal sources for the purpose of pay-
ing administrative expenses incurred by the commission under this subsection.  [ The commis-
sion shall manage the fund in a manner that provides support, but does not pay  for all the costs of any
one application. Additionally, the commission shall manage the fund to provide  continuous support to
as many applicants as possible. ]
(6) The  Teacher Standards and Practices Commission shall adopt rules that govern the dis-
bursement of moneys from the National Board Certification Fund consistent with this section.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 342.122 by section  1 of this 2017 Act become oper-
ative on July 1, 2018.
SECTION 3.  ORS 342.127 is amended to read:
342.127. (1) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission shall establish and collect:
(a) A fee not to exceed $350 for evaluation of the initial  application for each educator license
for which application is made. If the applicant is  eligible for the educator license for which appli-
cation is made, the commission shall issue the license without additional charge.
(b) A fee not to exceed $350 for the renewal of each educator license and a  fee not to exceed
$50 for each official paper license. If the educator is certified by a national professional or-
ganization for teaching standards recognized by the commission, the  commission shall renew
the license without charge.
(c) A fee not to exceed $800 for a beginning educator assessment conducted  in lieu of an ap-
proved preparation program required for licensure.
(d) A fee  not to exceed $350 for registration as a public charter school teacher or administrator
that includes any fee charged pursuant to rules adopted under ORS 181A.195.
(e) A fee not to exceed $350 for renewal of a registration as a public charter school teacher  or
administrator that includes any fee charged pursuant to rules adopted under ORS 181A.195.
(2) In addition to the fee required by  subsection (1) of this section for the issuance of an edu-
cator license, the commission shall collect a fee not to exceed $150 for the evaluation of  an appli-
cant requesting  licensing based upon completion of an educator preparation program other than an
Oregon approved educator preparation program.
(3) In addition to the fees required by subsection (1) of this section, the commission  shall collect
a late application fee not to exceed $40 per month up to a maximum of  $200 from an applicant who
fails to make timely application for renewal  of the license or registration. The actual amount of the
fee shall be determined in accordance with rules of the commission.
(4) In addition to the fees required by subsection (1) of this section, the commission  shall collect
a late application fee not  to exceed $350 for the reinstatement of an expired license. The require-
ments for reinstatement and the actual amount of the fee shall be determined in accordance  with
rules of the commission.
Enrolled House Bill 2763 (HB 2763-B) Page 2
(5) Notwithstanding the expiration date posted on the license,  the license shall continue to be
valid for an additional 120 days, provided the educator has made a  timely application, as determined
by the commission, for renewal prior to the expiration date on the license.
(6) In addition to the fee required by  subsection (1) of this section for the issuance of an edu-
cator license, the  commission shall collect a fee not to exceed $300 for the reinstatement of a license
that has been suspended or revoked by the commission for  gross neglect of duty or gross unfitness
under ORS 342.175.
(7) In addition to the fee required by  subsection (1) of this section for the issuance of an edu-
cator license, the commission  shall collect a fee not to exceed $200 for the issuance of any emer-
gency  license  through an expedited process at the request of any school district, public charter
school or education service district that seeks to  employ the applicant. The fee shall be paid by the
school district, public charter school or education service district.
(8) Fees established under this section  shall cover, but not exceed, the full cost of administrative
expenses incurred by the commission during any biennium.
SECTION 4. No later than April 1, 2020, the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission
shall submit a report to the legislative committees of  the Legislative Assembly related to
education. The report must:
(1) Summarize the effects on the educational outcomes  of this state as a result of the
increased number of teachers who hold national board certification;
(2) Summarize  any annual increases in the number of teachers who hold national board
certification in this state; and
(3) Identify the level of funding  necessary to increase the number of teachers who hold
national board certification in this state to 10 percent of all public school teachers.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the  Teacher Standards and Practices Commission, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,700,000, for deposit into the National Board
Certification Fund established by ORS 342.122.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5038),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  from
fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Teacher Standards and Practices Com-
mission, is increased by $1,700,000 for the purposes of ORS 342.122 (5).
Enrolled House Bill 2763 (HB 2763-B) Page 3
Passed by House July 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2763 (HB 2763-B) Page 4